Utah statutes.
73-10-6.   Making water available to citizens of state -- Assessment of charges against water users -- Water Resources Construction Fund.

The Board of Water Resources may make available for the use of the citizens of the state who are, in its opinion, best able to utilize the same, any or all water and power conserved by any of the projects to which the state may have title and may enter into contracts for the use of said water and power with individuals or with organizations composed of citizens of the state of Utah.  The board may assess against any person using such water and power such charges as, in the opinion of the board, are necessary and reasonable for the maintenance of the project and return to the state the actual costs of the project over such term of years as the board may deem it advisable.  Any amount collected as charges over and above the amount necessary to maintain any particular project shall become part of the Water Resources Construction Fund.



Amended by Chapter 169, 1988 General Session

